Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
607

COSTS AND
FEES

Section

607-1 Power of supreme court with respect to
costs and

fees

607-1.5 Court interpreting services revolving fund

607-2 Fees to be accounted for

607-2.5 Exemption of costs and fees

607-3 Court costs, waiver of prepayment,
reduction or

remission of

607-3.5 Security for costs

607-4 District court costs

607-5 Costs; circuit courts

607-5.5 Repealed

607-5.6 Surcharge for parent education for
separating parties

in matrimonial actions, where either party
has a

minor child, and for parties in parentage
actions;

special fund

607-5.7 Surcharge for indigent legal services

607-6 Appellate court costs

607-7 Deposit and payment of fees and costs on
appeal

607-8 Fees of sheriff, deputy sheriff, police
officer,

serving or levying officer, or independent
civil

process server

607-8.5 Assessment for bench warrant issuance

607-9 Cost charges exclusive; disbursements

607-10, 11 Repealed

607-12 Witnesses' fees, mileage; taxation

607-13 Costs; defendant's traveling expenses
taxable items in

certain events

607-14 Attorneys' fees in actions in the nature
of

assumpsit, etc.

607-14.5 Attorneys' fees and costs in civil actions

607-14.7 Attorney's fees, costs, and expenses;
judgment

creditors

607-14.9 Actions to enforce covenants not to
compete

607-15 Repealed

607-15.5 Attorneys' fees in tort actions

607-16 In both courts, when; set off against
judgment, when

607-17 Repealed

607-18 Compensation of trustees

607-19 Repealed

607-20 Charitable trusts, special provision

607-21 Expense of bond

607-22 Repealed

607-23 Fees of commissioners, appraisers, etc.

607-24 No bonds or costs to be filed or paid by
government

607-25 Actions based on failure to obtain
government

permit or approvals; attorney's fees and
costs

607-26 Limit on supersedeas bond

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next